sublime_text_3/Packages/russian_english.aff
SFX 181 Y 6
SFX 181 0 vy [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX 181 0 y [^aebcdfgiklmnoprstuvyz]
SFX 181 0 y [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX 181 0 y [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 181 0 y [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 181 0 y [aeiouy]e

SFX 182 Y 1
SFX 182 0 zy [^aeio][aeiou]z

SFX 183 Y 1
SFX 183 e y [^aeiouy]e

SFX 184 Y 2
SFX 184 0 ible [^e]
SFX 184 0 ible [aeiou]e

SFX 185 Y 1
SFX 185 e ible [^aeiou]e

SFX 186 Y 1
SFX 186 0 d e

SFX 187 Y 1
SFX 187 0 ed [^aeiou][cl]

SFX 188 Y 1
SFX 188 0 ed [^ecly]

SFX 189 Y 1
SFX 189 0 ed [aeio][aeiou][cl]

SFX 190 Y 1
SFX 190 0 ed [aeiou]y

SFX 191 Y 5
SFX 191 0 ing [^aeiou][cl]
SFX 191 0 ing [^ecl]
SFX 191 0 ing [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX 191 0 ing [eoy]e
SFX 191 0 ked [^aeio][aeiou]c

SFX 192 Y 2
SFX 192 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 192 0 led [^aeio][aeiou]l

SFX 193 Y 1
SFX 193 0 ling [^aeio][aeiou]l

SFX 194 Y 3
SFX 194 e ing [^eioy]e
SFX 194 ie ying ie
SFX 194 y ied [^aeiou]y

SFX 195 Y 5
SFX 195 0 ability [^aeiou][cl]
SFX 195 0 ability [^cely]
SFX 195 0 ability [acegilou]e
SFX 195 0 ability [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX 195 0 ability [aeiou]y

SFX 196 Y 1
SFX 196 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]c

SFX 197 Y 1
SFX 197 0 lability [^aeio][aeiou]l

SFX 198 Y 1
SFX 198 e ability [^acegilou]e

SFX 199 Y 1
SFX 199 y iability [^aeiou]y

SFX 200 Y 9
SFX 200 0 bedly [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX 200 0 dedly [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX 200 0 dly e
SFX 200 0 edly [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX 200 0 edly [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 200 0 edly [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX 200 0 edly [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 200 0 edly [aeiou]y
SFX 200 0 fedly [^aeio][aeiou]f

SFX 201 Y 1
SFX 201 0 gedly [^aeio][aeiou]g

SFX 202 Y 9
SFX 202 0 kedly [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 202 0 kedly [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX 202 0 ledly [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 202 0 medly [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX 202 0 nedly [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX 202 0 pedly [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX 202 0 redly [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX 202 0 sedly [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX 202 0 tedly [^aeio][aiou]t

SFX 203 Y 2
SFX 203 0 vedly [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX 203 0 zedly [^aeio][aeiou]z

SFX 204 Y 1
SFX 204 y iedly [^aeiou]y

SFX 205 Y 21
SFX 205 0 bedness [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX 205 0 dedness [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX 205 0 dness e
SFX 205 0 edness [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX 205 0 edness [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 205 0 edness [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX 205 0 edness [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 205 0 edness [aeiou]y
SFX 205 0 fedness [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX 205 0 gedness [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX 205 0 kedness [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 205 0 kedness [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX 205 0 ledness [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 205 0 medness [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX 205 0 nedness [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX 205 0 pedness [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX 205 0 redness [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX 205 0 sedness [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX 205 0 tedness [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX 205 0 vedness [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX 205 0 zedness [^aeio][aeiou]z

SFX 206 Y 1
SFX 206 y iedness [^aeiou]y

SFX 207 Y 2
SFX 207 0 fully [^y]
SFX 207 0 fully [aeiou]y

SFX 208 Y 1
SFX 208 y ifully [^aeiou]y

SFX 209 Y 6
SFX 209 0 ingly [^aeiou][cl]
SFX 209 0 ingly [^ecl]
SFX 209 0 ingly [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX 209 0 ingly [eoy]e
SFX 209 0 kingly [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 209 0 lingly [^aeio][aeiou]l

SFX 210 Y 2
SFX 210 e ingly [^eioy]e
SFX 210 ie yingly ie

SFX 211 Y 5
SFX 211 0 ably [^aeiou][cl]
SFX 211 0 ably [^cely]
SFX 211 0 ably [acegilou]e
SFX 211 0 ably [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX 211 0 ably [aeiou]y

SFX 212 Y 2
SFX 212 0 kably [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 212 0 lably [^aeio][aeiou]l

SFX 213 Y 2
SFX 213 e ably [^acegilou]e
SFX 213 y iably [^aeiou]y

SFX 214 Y 12
SFX 214 0 man [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 214 0 man [^bdeknmt]
SFX 214 0 man [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 214 0 man's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 214 0 man's [^bdeknmt]
SFX 214 0 man's [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 214 0 men [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 214 0 men [^bdeknmt]
SFX 214 0 men [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 214 0 men's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 214 0 men's [^bdeknmt]
SFX 214 0 men's [^bdklmnt]e

SFX 215 Y 8
SFX 215 0 sman [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 215 0 sman [bdknmt]
SFX 215 0 sman's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 215 0 sman's [bdknmt]
SFX 215 0 smen [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 215 0 smen [bdknmt]
SFX 215 0 smen's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 215 0 smen's [bdknmt]

SFX 216 Y 1
SFX 216 0 ation [^aeiou]l

SFX 217 Y 1
SFX 217 0 ation [^aelry]

SFX 218 Y 1
SFX 218 0 ation [^e]r

SFX 219 Y 3
SFX 219 0 ations [^aeiou]l
SFX 219 0 ations [^aelry]
SFX 219 0 ations [^e]r

SFX 220 Y 1
SFX 220 0 lation [aiou]l

SFX 221 Y 1
SFX 221 0 lations [aiou]l

SFX 222 Y 2
SFX 222 0 tion a
SFX 222 0 tions a

SFX 223 Y 2
SFX 223 e ation [^ckt]e
SFX 223 e ation [iou]te

SFX 224 Y 3
SFX 224 e ations [^ckt]e
SFX 224 e ations [iou]te
SFX 224 e ion [^iou]te

SFX 225 Y 1
SFX 225 e ions [^iou]te

SFX 226 Y 1
SFX 226 e tion ce

SFX 227 Y 2
SFX 227 e tions ce
SFX 227 el ulsion el

SFX 228 Y 2
SFX 228 el ulsions el
SFX 228 er ration er

SFX 229 Y 2
SFX 229 er rations er
SFX 229 ke cation ke

SFX 230 Y 1
SFX 230 ke cations ke

SFX 231 Y 3
SFX 231 y ation py
SFX 231 y ations py
SFX 231 y ication [^p]y

SFX 232 Y 1
SFX 232 y ications [^p]y

SFX 233 Y 3
SFX 233 0 ally [^aebcrtxmy]
SFX 233 0 ally [^ipux]t
SFX 233 0 ally [^u]m

SFX 234 Y 1
SFX 234 0 ially [bcrx]

SFX 235 Y 1
SFX 235 0 lly a

SFX 236 Y 1
SFX 236 0 tally [iu]t

SFX 237 Y 1
SFX 237 0 ually [px]t

SFX 238 Y 1
SFX 238 e ally [^bcgv]e

SFX 239 Y 1
SFX 239 e ially [bcgv]e

SFX 240 Y 1
SFX 240 um ally um

SFX 241 Y 1
SFX 241 y ally ty

SFX 242 Y 1
SFX 242 y ially [^t]y

SFX 243 Y 4
SFX 243 0 ess ll
SFX 243 0 less [^l]l
SFX 243 0 less [^ly]
SFX 243 0 less [aeiou]y

SFX 244 Y 1
SFX 244 y iless [^aeiou]y

SFX 245 Y 8
SFX 245 0 isation [^aemsy]
SFX 245 0 isation [^i]s
SFX 245 0 isation [^u]m
SFX 245 0 isation [aeiou]y
SFX 245 0 isations [^aemsy]
SFX 245 0 isations [^i]s
SFX 245 0 isations [^u]m
SFX 245 0 isations [aeiou]y

SFX 246 Y 2
SFX 246 0 tisation a
SFX 246 0 tisations a

SFX 247 Y 4
SFX 247 e isation [^l]e
SFX 247 e isation [aeiou]le
SFX 247 e isations [^l]e
SFX 247 e isations [aeiou]le

SFX 248 Y 2
SFX 248 le ilisation [^aeiou]le
SFX 248 le ilisations [^aeiou]le

SFX 249 Y 2
SFX 249 s sation is
SFX 249 s sations is

SFX 250 Y 2
SFX 250 um isation um
SFX 250 um isations um

SFX 251 Y 2
SFX 251 y isation [^aeiou]y
SFX 251 y isations [^aeiou]y

SFX 252 Y 1
SFX 252 0 er [^aeiou][cl]

SFX 253 Y 1
SFX 253 0 er [^ecly]

SFX 254 Y 1
SFX 254 0 er [aeio][aeiou][cl]

SFX 255 Y 1
SFX 255 0 er [aeiou]y

SFX 256 Y 2
SFX 256 0 ers [^aeiou][cl]
SFX 256 0 er's [^aeiou][cl]

SFX 257 Y 2
SFX 257 0 ers [^ecly]
SFX 257 0 er's [^ecly]

SFX 258 Y 2
SFX 258 0 ers [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX 258 0 er's [aeio][aeiou][cl]

SFX 259 Y 2
SFX 259 0 ers [aeiou]y
SFX 259 0 er's [aeiou]y

SFX 260 Y 1
SFX 260 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c

SFX 261 Y 2
SFX 261 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 261 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]c

SFX 262 Y 1
SFX 262 0 ler [^aeio][aeiou]l

SFX 263 Y 2
SFX 263 0 lers [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 263 0 ler's [^aeio][aeiou]l

SFX 264 Y 1
SFX 264 0 r e

SFX 265 Y 2
SFX 265 0 rs e
SFX 265 0 r's e

SFX 266 Y 1
SFX 266 y ier [^aeiou]y

SFX 267 Y 2
SFX 267 y iers [^aeiou]y
SFX 267 y ier's [^aeiou]y

SFX 268 Y 12
SFX 268 0 iser [^aemsy]
SFX 268 0 iser [^i]s
SFX 268 0 iser [^u]m
SFX 268 0 iser [aeiou]y
SFX 268 0 isers [^aemsy]
SFX 268 0 iser's [^aemsy]
SFX 268 0 isers [^i]s
SFX 268 0 iser's [^i]s
SFX 268 0 isers [^u]m
SFX 268 0 iser's [^u]m
SFX 268 0 isers [aeiou]y
SFX 268 0 iser's [aeiou]y

SFX 269 Y 3
SFX 269 0 tiser a
SFX 269 0 tisers a
SFX 269 0 tiser's a

SFX 270 Y 15
SFX 270 e iser [^l]e
SFX 270 e iser [aeiou]le
SFX 270 e isers [^l]e
SFX 270 e iser's [^l]e
SFX 270 e isers [aeiou]le
SFX 270 e iser's [aeiou]le
SFX 270 le iliser [^aeiou]le
SFX 270 le ilisers [^aeiou]le
SFX 270 le iliser's [^aeiou]le
SFX 270 s ser is
SFX 270 s sers is
SFX 270 s ser's is
SFX 270 um iser um
SFX 270 um isers um
SFX 270 um iser's um

SFX 271 Y 3
SFX 271 y iser [^aeiou]y
SFX 271 y isers [^aeiou]y
SFX 271 y iser's [^aeiou]y

SFX 272 Y 8
SFX 272 0 isability [^aemsy]
SFX 272 0 isability [^i]s
SFX 272 0 isability [^u]m
SFX 272 0 isability [aeiou]y
SFX 272 0 isable [^aemsy]
SFX 272 0 isable [^i]s
SFX 272 0 isable [^u]m
SFX 272 0 isable [aeiou]y

SFX 273 Y 2
SFX 273 0 tisability a
SFX 273 0 tisable a

SFX 274 Y 10
SFX 274 e isability [^l]e
SFX 274 e isability [aeiou]le
SFX 274 e isable [^l]e
SFX 274 e isable [aeiou]le
SFX 274 le ilisability [^aeiou]le
SFX 274 le ilisable [^aeiou]le
SFX 274 s sability is
SFX 274 s sable is
SFX 274 um isability um
SFX 274 um isable um

SFX 275 Y 2
SFX 275 y isability [^aeiou]y
SFX 275 y isable [^aeiou]y

SFX 276 Y 15
SFX 276 0 ativeness [^abdeilosty]
SFX 276 0 ativeness [^aeiou]l
SFX 276 0 iveness [st]
SFX 276 0 lativeness [aeiou]l
SFX 276 0 tiveness [aio]
SFX 276 b ptiveness b
SFX 276 be ptiveness be
SFX 276 d siveness d
SFX 276 de siveness de
SFX 276 e ativeness [^bcdkmst]e
SFX 276 e iveness [st]e
SFX 276 e ptiveness me
SFX 276 e tiveness ce
SFX 276 ke cativeness ke
SFX 276 y icativeness y

SFX 277 Y 2
SFX 277 0 atively [^abdeilosty]
SFX 277 0 atively [^aeiou]l

SFX 278 Y 1
SFX 278 0 ively [st]

SFX 279 Y 1
SFX 279 0 latively [aeiou]l

SFX 280 Y 1
SFX 280 0 tively [aio]

SFX 281 Y 1
SFX 281 b ptively b

SFX 282 Y 1
SFX 282 be ptively be

SFX 283 Y 1
SFX 283 d sively d

SFX 284 Y 1
SFX 284 de sively de

SFX 285 Y 1
SFX 285 e atively [^bcdkmst]e

SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286 e ively [st]e

SFX 287 Y 1
SFX 287 e ptively me

SFX 288 Y 1
SFX 288 e tively ce

SFX 289 Y 1
SFX 289 ke catively ke

SFX 290 Y 1
SFX 290 y icatively y

SFX 291 Y 1
SFX 291 0 atical [aeiou]m

SFX 292 Y 3
SFX 292 0 ical [^aeiou]m
SFX 292 0 ical [^aemry]
SFX 292 0 ical [^e]r

SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 0 tical ma

SFX 294 Y 1
SFX 294 a ical [^m]a

SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 e ical e

SFX 296 Y 1
SFX 296 er rical er

SFX 297 Y 1
SFX 297 y ical y

SFX 298 Y 8
SFX 298 0 ational [^aeiou]l
SFX 298 0 ational [^bdelrstxy]
SFX 298 0 ational [^e]r
SFX 298 0 ational nt
SFX 298 0 ationally [^aeiou]l
SFX 298 0 ationally [^bdelrstxy]
SFX 298 0 ationally [^e]r
SFX 298 0 ationally nt

SFX 299 Y 4
SFX 299 0 ional [^n]t
SFX 299 0 ional [sx]
SFX 299 0 ionally [^n]t
SFX 299 0 ionally [sx]

SFX 300 Y 2
SFX 300 0 lational [aiou]l
SFX 300 0 lationally [aiou]l

SFX 301 Y 2
SFX 301 b ptional b
SFX 301 b ptionally b

SFX 302 Y 2
SFX 302 be ptional be
SFX 302 be ptionally be

SFX 303 Y 2
SFX 303 d sional d
SFX 303 d sionally d

SFX 304 Y 2
SFX 304 de sional de
SFX 304 de sionally de

SFX 305 Y 2
SFX 305 e ational [^bcdkst]e
SFX 305 e ationally [^bcdkst]e

SFX 306 Y 4
SFX 306 e ional [^o]se
SFX 306 e ional te
SFX 306 e ionally [^o]se
SFX 306 e ionally te

SFX 307 Y 2
SFX 307 e itional ose
SFX 307 e itionally ose

SFX 308 Y 2
SFX 308 e tional ce
SFX 308 e tionally ce

SFX 309 Y 2
SFX 309 el ulsional el
SFX 309 el ulsionally el

SFX 310 Y 2
SFX 310 er rational er
SFX 310 er rationally er

SFX 311 Y 2
SFX 311 ke cational ke
SFX 311 ke cationally ke

SFX 312 Y 2
SFX 312 y icational y
SFX 312 y icationally y

SFX 313 Y 3
SFX 313 0 ary ion
SFX 313 0 atory [^i]m
SFX 313 0 ery h

SFX 314 Y 8
SFX 314 0 nery [aiu]n
SFX 314 0 ory [^aeous]t
SFX 314 0 ory s
SFX 314 0 ry [^aiou]n
SFX 314 0 ry [^ehmstn]
SFX 314 0 ry [^i]on
SFX 314 0 ry [^mrst]e
SFX 314 0 ry [aeous]t

SFX 315 Y 3
SFX 315 e ary se
SFX 315 e atory [mr]e
SFX 315 e ory te

SFX 316 Y 1
SFX 316 im matory im

SFX 317 Y 1
SFX 317 0 bily [^aeio][aeiou]b

SFX 318 Y 1
SFX 318 0 dily [^aeio][aeiou]d

SFX 319 Y 1
SFX 319 0 fily [^aeio][aeiou]f

SFX 320 Y 1
SFX 320 0 gily [^aeio][aeiou]g

SFX 321 Y 8
SFX 321 0 ily [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX 321 0 ily [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX 321 0 ily [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX 321 0 ily [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX 321 0 ily [aeiouy]e
SFX 321 0 ily [aiou]y
SFX 321 0 kily [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 321 0 kily [^aeio][aeiou]k

SFX 322 Y 1
SFX 322 0 lily [^aeio][aeiou]l

SFX 323 Y 1
SFX 323 0 mily [^aeio][aeiou]m

SFX 324 Y 1
SFX 324 0 nily [^aeio][aiou]n

SFX 325 Y 1
SFX 325 0 pily [^aeio][aeiou]p

SFX 326 Y 1
SFX 326 0 rily [^aeio][aiou]r

SFX 327 Y 1
SFX 327 0 sily [^aeio][aeiou]s

SFX 328 Y 1
SFX 328 0 tily [^aeio][aiou]t

SFX 329 Y 1
SFX 329 0 vily [^aeio][aeiou]v

SFX 330 Y 1
SFX 330 0 zily [^aeio][aeiou]z

SFX 331 Y 1
SFX 331 e ily [^aeiouy]e

SFX 332 Y 1
SFX 332 ey ily ey
